North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-07 Sale and Lease of Nongrant Lands

15-07-01.
Definitions.

The terms “other than original grant lands” or “nongrant lands” mean all lands obtained by the board of university and school lands in any manner other than that described in section 15-06-01.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 15-0701.

Law Reviews.

State Lands: What Are We Doing? Thomas O. Smith, 51 N.D. L. Rev. 477 (1975).

15-07-02.
Rules and regulations for sale of nongrant lands — Powers of board.

The board of university and school lands may make such rules and regulations not in conflict with the provisions of this title as it deems necessary as to the manner, place, and time of payment of principal and interest, the conduct of the business of selling and disposing of lands other than original grant lands, and the terms and conditions of those sales. The board may sell nongrant lands on amortized payment contracts, and renegotiate the terms of those contracts, so long as the purchaser, at the time renegotiation is requested, has paid at least thirty percent of the purchase price and the resulting contract is consistent with this chapter and with the board’s fiduciary responsibilities.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 118, §§ 8, 34; R.C. 1895, §§ 175, 201; R.C. 1899, §§ 175, 201; S.L. 1901, ch. 193, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 159, 185; C.L. 1913, §§ 292, 319; S.L. 1925, ch. 178, § 1; 1925, ch. 179, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 292, 319; S.L. 1929, ch. 214, § 1; 1931, ch. 233, § 1; 1931, ch. 234, § 2; 1941, ch. 252, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 15-0702; S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 2.

15-07-03.
Sale of nongrant lands authorized.

The board of university and school lands may sell nongrant land at either private or public sale as provided in this chapter. Any sale is subject to any existing lease of the land.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 118, §§ 8, 33, 34; R.C. 1895, §§ 175, 200, 201; S.L. 1897, ch. 143, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 175, 200, 201; S.L. 1901, ch. 193, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 159, 184, 185; C.L. 1913, §§ 292, 318, 319; S.L. 1925, ch. 178, § 1; 1925, ch. 179, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 292, 319; S.L. 1929, ch. 214, § 1; 1931, ch. 233, § 1; 1931, ch. 234, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 15-0703.

15-07-04.
Sale requirements.

Any land sold under the provisions of this chapter must be by public auction or sealed bids, except purchases under the provisions of section 15-07-10.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 118, §§ 8, 33, 34; R.C. 1895, §§ 175, 200, 201; S.L. 1897, ch. 143, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 175, 200, 201; S.L. 1901, ch. 193, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 159, 184, 185; C.L. 1913, §§ 292, 318, 319; S.L. 1925, ch. 178, § 1; 1925, ch. 179, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 292, 319; S.L. 1929, ch. 214, § 1; 1931, ch. 233, § 1; 1931, ch. 234, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 15-0704; S.L. 1955, ch. 129, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 15-0704; S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 3; 1987, ch. 194, § 2; 1989, ch. 192, § 2.

15-07-05.
Public sale of lands other than original grant lands — Notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-06.
Public sale of nongrant lands — Terms and conditions of sale — Contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-07.
Conveyance to purchaser upon payment in full of purchase price.

When the purchase price of any nongrant land sold under the provisions of this chapter, together with any interest on deferred payments due under such contract, has been paid in full, the lands purchased must be conveyed to the purchaser, or the purchaser’s heirs or assigns, by quitclaim deed executed in the name of the state of North Dakota by the commissioner of university and school lands, attested by the secretary of state, with the great seal of the state of North Dakota affixed.

Source:

S.L. 1893, ch. 118, §§ 8, 33, 34; R.C. 1895, §§ 175, 200, 201; S.L. 1897, ch. 143, § 1; R.C. 1899, §§ 175, 200, 201; S.L. 1901, ch. 193, § 1; R.C. 1905, §§ 159, 184, 185; C.L. 1913, §§ 292, 318, 319; S.L. 1925, ch. 178, § 1; 1925, ch. 179, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 292, 319; S.L. 1929, ch. 214, § 1; 1931, ch. 233, § 1; 1931, ch. 234, § 2; 1939, ch. 224, § 2, subs. 20; 1941, ch. 252, § 1, subs. 6; R.C. 1943, § 15-0707; S.L. 1947, ch. 158, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 15-0707.

15-07-07.1.
Former conveyances confirmed.

In all cases where nongrant lands have been conveyed by conveyances executed otherwise than is provided by section 15-07-07, such conveyances are hereby in all things ratified and confirmed.

Source:

S.L. 1947, ch. 158, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 15-07071.

15-07-08.
Sale of nongrant lands on crop payment contract — Conditions precedent to sale. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-09.
Sale of nongrant lands on crop payment contract — Payment of purchase price. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-10.
Mortgagor has right to repurchase.

If any mortgagor or a member of the mortgagor’s immediate family, including a father, mother, son, daughter, brother, sister, or spouse, desires to repurchase land lost through foreclosure or by a deed given in lieu of foreclosure, such repurchase may be made by matching the highest bid within one hour after public sale. The terms and conditions of any sale under this section must be established by the board of university and school lands, consistent with this title and the fiduciary responsibilities of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 224, § 2, subs. 12; R.C. 1943, § 15-0710; S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 4; 1995, ch. 164, § 1.

Cross-References.

Terms and prices on repurchase, see

N.D.C.C. § 15-07-04.

15-07-11.
Purchaser of farmlands purchased on crop share payment contract — Account of farm income — Assignability of contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-12.
Use of lands purchased on crop payment contract for other than income purposes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-13.
Applicant for purchase on crop payment contract to pay appraisal fee — Private sale authorized on crop payment contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-14.
State has lien on produce of lands sold on crop payment contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-15.
Sale of nongrant lands on amortized payment plan — Conditions of sale. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-16.
Application to purchase nongrant lands on amortization contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-17.
Terms of sale of nongrant lands sold on amortization contract. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-18.
Contract of sale on amortized payment plan. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 193, § 5.

15-07-19.
Islands owned by state — Lease and sale. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

15-07-20.
Leasing of nongrant lands.

The board of university and school lands may lease nongrant lands under reasonable rules as it may establish. The rules may provide for leasing with or without advertisement or competitive bidding. Leases made under this section must be for cash only, and the rental must be collected in advance except that the board may collect a share of a conservation reserve program payment paid by the federal government. A lease of nongrant lands may not extend for a period of more than five years, except any land accepted into the conservation reserve program may have a lease term that coincides with the term of the conservation reserve program contract if so provided in the lease. Leases may be renewed at the discretion of the board. When nongrant lands are leased without advertisement or competitive bidding, the board shall determine the rental by taking into consideration the nature and adaptability of the lands and the improvements thereon.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 15-0720; S.L. 1983, ch. 187, § 1; 1989, ch. 192, § 3; 1999, ch. 152, § 4.

15-07-21.
Cancellation of leases of nongrant lands.

Leases of nongrant lands are subject to cancellation upon like conditions and in like manner as leases of original grant lands.

Source:

R.C. 1943, § 15-0721.

Cross-References.

Failure to summer-fallow land as ground for cancellation, see

N.D.C.C. § 15-04-04.

15-07-22.
Appropriation for expenses — Continuing appropriation.

There is appropriated annually the amounts necessary to pay expenses for trust land controlled by the board of university and school lands, including appraisal fees, survey costs, clean-up or demolition costs, weed and insect control costs, rural fire district reimbursements for fire protection, and expenses determined by the board as necessary to manage, preserve, and enhance the value of the trust asset. Each payment must be made from the trust fund for which the land is held.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 129, § 7.